District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.35

“Proof of financial responsibility for the future”, “proof”, or “proof of financial responsibility” defined.

The terms “proof of financial responsibility for the future” or “proof” or “proof of financial responsibility” as used in this chapter shall mean: Proof that the motor vehicle subject to registration or reciprocity under the laws of the District of Columbia is an insured motor vehicle under the provisions of the Compulsory/No-Fault Motor Vehicle Insurance Act of 1982.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 129, ch. 222, § 35
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(c)(2), 29 DCR 3491

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-435.
1973 Ed., § 40-451.

References in Text

The “Compulsory/No-Fault Motor Vehicle Insurance Act of 1982”, referred to at the end of the section, is D.C. Law 4-155.